Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-202
Amendments proposed by Legislature; publication.

Such proposed amendment or amendments shall be published by the Secretary of State once each week for three weeks, in at least one newspaper to be designated by the Governor, in each county where a newspaper is published, immediately preceding the next election of members of the Legislature, with notice prefixed thereto that at such election such proposed amendment or amendments will be submitted to the electors of this state for approval or rejection.

Laws 1877, § 2, p. 114;

Laws 1895, c. 3, § 1, p. 67;

Laws 1909, c. 2, § 1, p. 54;

R.S.1913, § 3699;

C.S.1922, § 3087;

Laws 1925, c. 112, § 2, p. 303;

C.S.1929, § 49-202;

R.S.1943, § 49-202;

Laws 1953, c. 170, § 1, p. 545.

For required publication, see Article XVI, section 1, Constitution of Nebraska.